Alaska statutes. Title 13. Decedents’ Estates, Guardianships, Transfers, Trusts, and Health Care Decisions.
Chapter 90. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 13.90.010.
Investments by fiduciaries.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, except for AS

13.36.300

and the standards of judgment and care established by law, and subject to any express provision or limitation contained in a particular instrument creating the fiduciary relationship, fiduciaries are authorized to acquire and hold securities of an investment company.

Whenever an instrument or power governing a fiduciary relationship directs, requires, authorizes, or permits investment in obligations of the United States government, or its agencies or instrumentalities, the fiduciary may invest in those obligations either directly or in the form of securities of, or other interests in, an investment company if

the portfolio of the company is limited to

obligations of the United States government, or its agencies or instrumentalities;

repurchase agreements fully collateralized by the obligations identified in (A) of this paragraph; and

securities of, or other interests in, other investment companies whose portfolios are limited to the obligations and repurchase agreements identified in (A) and (B) of this paragraph; and

the investment company takes delivery of the collateral for any repurchase agreement either directly or through an authorized custodian.

Under (a) and (b) of this section, if a bank or trust company is the fiduciary, the bank or trust company may invest or reinvest in the securities of an investment company even if the fiduciary or an affiliated bank or trust company provides services to the investment company and the fiduciary or affiliate receives reasonable compensation for the services. Upon request of the person, the fiduciary shall furnish a copy of the prospectus relating to the securities acquired under this subsection to a person to whom a regular periodic accounting is ordinarily rendered under an instrument creating a fiduciary relationship.

In this section,

“affiliated” means two or more banks or trust companies in which

25 percent or more of the voting shares, excluding shares owned by the United States or by a corporation or another entity wholly owned by the United States, is directly or indirectly owned or controlled by a holding company; or

the election of a majority of the directors is controlled in any manner by a holding company;

“bank” means an organization that is authorized by the United States Comptroller of the Currency, or by the director of banking or the equivalent position in the state of its organization, to accept deposits and to make commercial loans, and whose deposits are insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation;

“fiduciary” includes guardians and conservators under AS 13.26, persons performing the trustee activities described under AS

06.05.180

whether or not the persons are covered by AS

06.05.180

, and other persons acting in a fiduciary capacity;

“investment company” means an open-end or closed-end management type investment company or investment trust registered under 15 U.S.C. 80a-1 — 80a-64 (Investment Company Act of 1940), as that act exists now or as amended in the future;

“services” includes acting as an investment advisor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, manager, and services related to acting as an investment advisor, custodian, transfer agent, registrar, sponsor, distributor, or manager;

“trust company” means a financial institution, corporation, or other legal entity, authorized to exercise general trust powers, but does not include a natural person.

History.

(§ 4 ch 10 SLA 1996; am § 2 ch 106 SLA 1996)